Hawaii statutes.
[§489P-5] Persons not required to place
security freeze. The requirement under this chapter to place a security
freeze on a credit report shall not apply to:

(1) A check services or fraud prevention services
company that reports on incidents of fraud or issues authorizations for the
purpose of approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic fund
transfers, or similar methods of payment;

(2) A deposit account information service company
that issues reports regarding account closures due to fraud, substantial
overdrafts, ATM abuse, or similar negative information regarding a consumer to
inquiring banks or other financial institutions for use only in reviewing a
consumer request for a deposit account at the inquiring bank or financial
institution;

(3) A consumer reporting agency that:

(A) Acts only to resell credit information by
assembling and merging information contained in a database of one or more
consumer reporting agencies; and

(B) Does not maintain a permanent database of
credit information from which new credit reports are produced. [L 2006, c 138,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next